hyph_pl.dic
„spodż2
„spod3d
„sporz2
„sposz2
„sr8
„ss8
„st8
„stere2o3
„stereoa2
„stereoe2
„stereoi2
„stereoo2
„stereou2
„su2b3
„su3b4ie
„su3b4otn
„supe2r3
„supe3r4at
„supe3r4io
„supe4r5a2tr
„super5z2b
„supere2
„supero2d1rzut
„sv8
„sw8
„sx8
„sz8
„sześćse2t3
„sześcio3ś2
„sze2ś2ć3
„sze2s3
„tć8
„tł8
„tń8
„tś8
„tź8
„tż8
„t8
„ta2o3
„ta2r7zan
„tb8
„tc8
„tch8
„td8
„te2o3
„tf8
„tg8
„th8
„tj8
„tk8
„tl8
„tm8
„tn8
„toa3
„tp8
„tró2j3
„tró3j4ą
„tró3j4ę
„tró3j4ecz
„tr8
„tran2s3
„tran3s4e
„tran3s4ie
„tran3s4y
„tran3sz
„tran4s5eu
„transa2
„transo2
„trz8
„trze2ch3
„trzechse2t3
„ts8
„tt8
„tv8
„tw8
„tx8
„tysią2c3
„tysią3c4a
„tysią3c4e
„tysią3cz
„tysią4c5zł
„tz8
„uć2
„uś2
„u3ł2
„u3ź2
„u3ż2
„u3b2
„u3c2
„u3d2
„u3f2
„u3g2
„u3h2
„u3k2
„u3l2
„u3m2
„u3n2
„u3p2
„u3r2
„u3s2
„u3t2
„u3w2
„u3z2
„u4d3k
„u4f3n
„u4k3lej
„u4l3s
„u4l3t
„u4m3br
„u4n3c
„u4n3d
„u4p3p2s
„u4r3s
„u4st3n
„u4stc
„u4stk
„u4z3be
„ube2z3
„ubezw2
„ubr2
„uch2
„ucz2
„udź2
„udż2
„udz2
„ukr2
„umk2
„upch2
„upo2d2
„upo3ć2
„upo3ł2
„upo3ś2
„upo3ź2
„upo3ż2
„upo3b2
„upo3c2
„upo3da
„upo3f2
„upo3g2
„upo3h2
„upo3k2
„upo3l2
„upo3m2
„upo3p2
„upo3r2
„upo3s2
„upo3t2
„upo3w2
„upo3z2
„upoch2
„upocz2
„upodź2
„upodż2
„upod3d
„uporz2
„uposz2
„urż2
„uro2z3
„urz2
„usch2
„usz2
„utk2
„utr2
„uze3w2
„vć8
„vł8
„vń8
„vś8
„vź8
„vż8
„v8
„vb8
„vc8
„vd8
„vf8
„vg8
„vh8
„vj8
„vk8
„vl8
„vm8
„vn8
„vp8
„vr8
„vs8
„vt8
„vv8
„vw8
„vx8
„vz8
„wć8
„wł8
„wń8
„wś8
„wź8
„wż8
„w8
„wb8
„wc8
„wd8
„we3ć2
„we3ł2
„we3ś2
„we3ż2
„we3b2
„we3c2
„we3d2
„we3f2
„we3g2
„we3h2
„we3k2
„we3l2
„we3m2
„we3n2
„we3p2
„we3r2
„we3s2
„we3t2
„we3w2
„we3z2
„we4ł3n
„we4k3t
„we4l3w
„we4n3d
„we4n3t
„we4r3b
„we4r3d
„we4r3n
„we4r3s
„we4r3t
„we4s3prz
„we4s3tch2
„we4z3br
„we4z3gł
„wech2
„wecz2
„wedź2
„wedż2
„wedz2
„wemk2
„wepch2
„werz2
„wesz2
„wetk2
„wewną2trz3
„wf8
„wg8
„wh8
„wielo3ś2
„wielo3d2
„wielo3k2
„wieluse2t3
„wilczo3m2
„wj8
„wk8
„wl8
„wm8
„wn8
„wniebo3w2
„wodo3w2
„wp8
„wr8
„ws8
„współi2
„współo2b3w
„współu2
„współw2
„wspó2ł3
„wsze2ch3
„wszecho2
„wszechw2
„wt8
„wv8
„ww8
„wx8
„wy3ć2
„wy3ł2
„wy3ś2
„wy3ź2
„wy3ż2
„wy3b2
„wy3c2
„wy3d2
„wy3f2
„wy3g2
„wy3h2
„wy3k2
„wy3l2
„wy3m2
„wy3o2d3r
„wy3p2
„wy3r2
„wy3s2
„wy3t2
„wy3w2
„wy3z2
„wy4ż3sz
„wy4cz3ha
„wybr2
„wybrz2
„wych2
„wycz2
„wydź2
„wydż2
„wydr2
„wydz2
„wye2k2s3
„wygrz2
„wyi2zo
„wykl2
„wykr2
„wykrz2
„wymk2
„wypch2
„wyprz2
„wyrż2
„wyrz2
„wysch2
„wysm2
„wysz2
„wytch2
„wytk2
„wytr2
„wz8
„xć8
„xł8
„xń8
„xś8
„xź8
„xż8
„x8
„xb8
„xc8
„xd8
„xf8
„xg8
„xh8
„xj8
„xk8
„xl8
„xm8
„xn8
„xp8
„xr8
„xs8
„xt8
„xv8
„xw8
„xx8
„xz8
„zć8
„zł8
„zło3w2
„zń8
„zś8
„zź8
„zż8
„z8
„za3ć2
„za3ł2
„za3ś2
„za3ź2
„za3ż2
„za3b2
„za3c2
„za3d2
„za3f2
„za3g2
„za3h2
„za3k2
„za3l2
„za3m2
„za3o2b3r
„za3o2b3s
„za3p2
„za3r2
„za3s2
„za3t2
„za3u2
„za3w2
„za3z2
„za4k3t
„za4l3g
„za4l3k
„za4l3t
„za4m3k
„za4r3ch
„za4uto
„za5m4k2n
„zabr2
„zabrz2
„zach2
„zacz2
„zadź2
„zadż2
„zadośću4
„zado2ść3
„zadr2
„zady2s3po
„zadz2
„zagrz2
„zai2n3
„zai2zo
„zain4ic
„zakl2
„zakr2
„zakrz2
„zanie3d2
„zarż2
„zarz2
„zasch2
„zasm2
„zasz2
„zatk2
„zatr2
„zb8
„zc8
„zd8
„zde2z3
„zde3z4awu
„zde3z4el
„zde3z4er
„zde3z4y
„zdy2s3kont
„zdy2s3kred
„zdy2s3kwal
„ze3ć2
„ze3ł2
„ze3ś2
„ze3ź2
„ze3ż2
„ze3b2
„ze3c2
„ze3d2
„ze3f2
„ze3g2
„ze3h2
„ze3k2
„ze3l2
„ze3m2
„ze3p2
„ze3r2
„ze3s2
„ze3t2
„ze3tk2
„ze3w2
„ze3z2
„ze4r3k
„ze4t3e2m1e2s
„ze4t3e2s1e2l
„ze4t3emp
„ze4t3hap
„zech2
„zecz2
„zedź2
„zedż2
„zedz2
„zekl2
„zepch2
„zerż2
„zerz2
„zesch2
„zesm4
„zesz2
„zf8
„zg8
„zh8
„zimno3kr2
„zj8
„zk8
„zl8
„zm8
„zmartwy2ch3
„zmartwychw2
„zn8
„znie3ć2
„znie3ł2
„znie3ń2
„znie3ś2
„znie3ź2
„znie3ż2
„znie3b2
„znie3c2
„znie3d2
„znie3f2
„znie3g2
„znie3h2
„znie3k2
„znie3l2
„znie3m2
„znie3n2
„znie3p2
„znie3r2
„znie3s2
„znie3t2
„znie3w2
„znie3z2
„znie4dź3
„znie4m3c
„zniech2
„zniecz2
„zniedż2
„zniedz2
„znierz2
„zniesz2
„zo2o3
„zp8
„zr8
„zro2z3
„zro3z4u
„zs8
„zt8
„zv8
„zw8
„zx8
„zz8
